Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.930

Construction of chapter—Employer's responsibilities and rights preserved.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to interfere with the responsibilities and rights of the employer as specified by federal and state law, including the employer's responsibilities to students, the public, and other constituent elements of the institution.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 24.]